California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 interest in all target populations, including, but not limited to, children and youth, adults, and older adults.

(d) The planning council shall annually elect a chairperson and a chair-elect.

(e) The term of each member shall be three years, to be staggered so that approximately one-third of the appointments expire in each year.

(f) In the event of changes in the federal requirements regarding the structure and function of the planning council, or the discontinuation of federal funding, the State Department of Health Care Services shall, with input from state-level advocacy groups, consumers, family members and providers, and other stakeholders, propose to the Legislature modifications in the structure of the planning
 council that the department deems appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 332, Sec. 3.   (AB 2207)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5771.1.

(a) The members of the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission established pursuant to Section 5845 are members of the California Behavioral Health Planning Council. They serve in an ex officio capacity when the council is performing its statutory duties pursuant to Section 5772. This membership does not affect the composition requirements for the council specified in Section 5771.

(b) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 33) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 11.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5771.1.

(a) The members of the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission established pursuant to Section 5845 are members of the California Behavioral Health Planning Council.

(b) These members serve in an ex officio capacity when the council is performing its statutory duties pursuant to Section 5772.

(c) This membership does not affect the composition requirements for the council specified in Section 5771.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the
 voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 33) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 34.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5771.3.

The California Behavioral Health Planning Council may utilize staff of the State Department of Health Care Services, to the extent they are available, and the staff of any other public or private agencies that have an interest in the mental health or substance use disorders, or both, of the public and that are able and willing to provide those services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 13.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5771.5.

(a) (1) The Chairperson of the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, with the concurrence of a majority of the members of the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, shall appoint an executive officer who shall have those powers delegated to him or her by the council in accordance with this chapter.

(2) The executive officer shall be exempt from civil service.

(b) Within the limit of funds allotted for these purposes, the California Behavioral Health Planning Council may appoint other staff it may require according to the rules and procedures of the civil
 service system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 14.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5772.

The California Behavioral Health Planning Council shall have the powers and authority necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon it by this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) To advocate for effective, quality mental health and substance use disorder programs.

(b) To review, assess, and make recommendations regarding all components of California’s mental health and substance use disorder systems, and to report as necessary to the Legislature, the State Department of Health Care Services, local boards, and local programs.

(c) To review program
 performance in delivering mental health and substance use disorder services by annually reviewing performance outcome data as follows:

(1) To review and approve the performance outcome measures.

(2) To review the performance of mental health and substance use disorder programs based on performance outcome data and other reports from the State Department of Health Care Services and other sources.

(3) To report findings and recommendations on the performance of programs annually to the Legislature, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the local boards, and to post those findings and recommendations annually on its Internet Web site.

(4) To
 identify successful programs for recommendation and for consideration of replication in other areas. As data and technology are available, identify programs experiencing difficulties.

(d) When appropriate, make a finding pursuant to Section 5655 that a county’s performance in delivering mental health services is failing in a substantive manner. The State Department of Health Care Services shall investigate and review the finding, and report the action taken to the Legislature.

(e) To advise the Legislature, the State Department of Health Care Services, and county boards on mental health and substance use disorder issues and the policies and priorities that this state should be pursuing in developing its mental health and substance use disorder health systems.

(f) To periodically review the state’s data systems and paperwork requirements to ensure that they are reasonable and in compliance with state and federal law.

(g) To make recommendations to the State Department of Health Care Services on the award of grants to county programs to reward and stimulate innovation in providing mental health and substance use disorder services.

(h) To conduct public hearings on the state mental health plan, the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration block grant, and other topics, as needed.

(i) In conjunction with other statewide and local mental health and substance use disorder organizations, assist in the
 coordination of training and information to local mental health boards as needed to ensure that they can effectively carry out their duties.

(j) To advise the Director of Health Care Services on the development of the state mental health plan and the system of priorities contained in that plan.

(k) To assess periodically the effect of realignment of mental health services and any other important changes in the state’s mental health and substance use disorder systems, and to report its findings to the Legislature, the State Department of Health Care Services, local programs, and local boards, as appropriate.

(l) To suggest rules, regulations, and standards for the administration of this division.

(m) When requested, to mediate disputes between counties and the state arising under this part.

(n) To employ administrative, technical, and other personnel necessary for the performance of its powers and duties, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance.

(o) To accept any federal fund granted, by act of Congress or by executive order, for purposes within the purview of the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance.

(p) To accept any gift, donation, bequest, or grants of funds from private and public agencies for all or any of the purposes within the purview of the California Behavioral Health
 Planning Council, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance.

(q) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a), (c), (e), (g), and (i), in the event that the State Department of Health Care Services determines that California’s Community Mental Health Services Block Grant funding pursuant to Section 300x et seq. of Title 42 of the United States Code is in jeopardy due to the California Behavioral Health Planning Council’s noncompliance with the requirements specified in Public Law 102-321, the State Department of Health Care Services shall notify and consult with the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, and the California Behavioral Health Planning Council shall make the changes necessary to comply with federal law.

(r) The Legislature finds and declares that the
 amendments made to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (e), (g), (i), and (k) by the act that added this subdivision are consistent with Section 5892.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 15.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. ADULT AND OLDER ADULT MENTAL HEALTH SYSTEM OF CARE ACT [5800. - 5815.]

5800.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Adult and Older Adult Mental Health System of Care Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 153, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Intent [5801. - 5802.]

5801.

(a) A system of care for adults and older adults with severe mental illness results in the highest benefit to the client, family, and community while ensuring that the public sector meets its legal responsibility and fiscal liability at the lowest possible cost.

(b) The underlying philosophy for these systems of care includes the following:

(1) Mental health care is a basic human service.

(2) Adults and older adults with a serious mental health condition are citizens of a community with all the rights, privileges, opportunities, and responsibilities
 accorded other citizens.

(3) Adults and older adults with a serious mental health condition usually have multiple disabling conditions and should have the highest priority among adults for mental health services.

(4) Adults
 and older adults with a serious mental health condition should have an interagency network of services with multiple points of access and be assigned a single person or team to be responsible for all treatment, case management, and community support services.

(5) The client should be fully informed and volunteer for all treatment provided, unless danger to self or others or grave disability requires temporary involuntary treatment, or the client is under a court order for assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to Section 5346 and, prior to the filing of the petition for assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to Section 5346, the client has been offered an opportunity to participate in treatment on a voluntary basis and has failed to engage in that treatment, or the client is under a court order for CARE pursuant to Part 8
 (commencing with Section 5970) and, prior to the court-ordered CARE plan, the client has been offered an opportunity to enter into a CARE agreement on a voluntary basis and has declined to do so.

(6) Clients and families should directly participate in making decisions about services and resource allocations that affect their lives.

(7) People in local communities are the most knowledgeable regarding their particular environments, issues, service gaps and strengths, and opportunities.

(8) Mental health services should be responsive to the unique characteristics of people with a mental health condition,
 including age, gender, minority and ethnic status, and the effect of multiple conditions.

(9) For the majority of
 adults and older adults with a serious mental health condition, treatment is best provided in the client’s natural setting in the community. Treatment, case management, and community support services should be designed to prevent inappropriate removal from the natural environment to more restrictive and costly placements.

(10) Mental health systems of care shall have measurable goals and be fully accountable by providing measures of client outcomes and cost of services.

(11) State and county government agencies each have
 responsibilities and fiscal liabilities for adults and older adults with a serious mental health condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 42.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5802.

(a) The Legislature finds that a mental health system of care for adults and older adults with severe and persistent mental illness is vital for successful management of mental health care in California. Specifically:

(1) A comprehensive and coordinated system of care includes community-based treatment, outreach services and other early intervention strategies, case management, and interagency system components required by adults and older adults with severe and persistent mental illness.

(2) Adults and
 older adults
 with a mental health condition receive service from many different state and county agencies, particularly criminal justice, employment, housing, public welfare, health, and mental health. In a system of care these agencies collaborate in order to deliver integrated and cost-effective programs.

(3) The recovery of persons with severe mental illness and their financial means are important for all levels of government, business, and the community.

(4) System of care services that ensure culturally competent care for persons with severe mental illness in the most appropriate, least restrictive level of care are necessary to achieve the desired performance outcomes.

(5) Mental health service providers need to increase accountability and further develop methods to measure
 progress towards client outcome goals and cost-effectiveness as required by a system of care.

(b) The Legislature further finds that the adult system of care model, beginning in the 1989–90 fiscal year through the implementation of Chapter 982 of the Statutes of 1988, provides models for adults and older adults with severe mental illness that can meet the performance outcomes required by the Legislature.

(c) The Legislature also finds that the system components established in adult systems of care are of value in providing greater benefit to adults and older adults with severe and persistent mental illness at a lower cost in California.

(d) Therefore, using the guidelines and principles developed under the demonstration projects implemented under the adult system of care legislation in 1989, it is the intent of the
 Legislature to accomplish the following:

(1) Encourage each county to implement a system of care as described in this legislation for the delivery of mental health services to adults and older adults with
 a serious mental illness.

(2) To promote a system of care accountability for performance outcomes that enable adults with severe mental illness to reduce symptoms that impair their ability to live independently, work, maintain community supports, care for their children, stay in good health, not misuse drugs or alcohol, and not commit crimes.

(3) Maintain funding for the existing pilot adult system of care programs that meet contractual goals as models and technical assistance resources for future expansion of system of care programs to
 other counties as funding becomes available.

(4) Provide funds for counties to establish outreach programs and to provide mental health services and related medications, substance use disorder services, supportive housing or other housing assistance, vocational rehabilitation, and other nonmedical programs necessary to stabilize persons who are experiencing homelessness with a mental health condition or persons with a mental health condition who
 are at risk of being homeless, get them off the street, and into treatment and recovery, or to provide access to veterans’ services that will also provide for treatment and recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 43.5.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Establishing New County Systems of Care [5803. - 5809.]

5803.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall issue a request for proposals to develop system of care programs no later than October 1 in any year in which the state budget provides new funds to expand the system of care provided for in this chapter. The request for proposals shall include the following:

(1) Proposals may be submitted as a regional system of care by counties acting jointly, independent countywide proposals, and proposals to serve discrete geographic areas within counties or for a specific integrated
 services agency team. Nothing in the request for proposal shall be construed to restrict a county from contracting for part or all services included in the demonstration project proposal.

(2) The department shall establish reporting requirements for direct and indirect costs, and these requirements may be included in the request for proposals.

(3) The department shall require that proposals identify resources necessary to measure client and cost outcome and interagency collaboration. Proposal guidelines shall clearly require identification of procedures to document outcomes.

(4) Proposals must be approved by the board of supervisors and the local mental health board or commission.

(b) The director shall prepare a method for rating proposals to assure
 objectivity and selection of the best qualified applications. New proposals shall be selected with consideration of regional balance across the state.

(c) The State Department of
 Health Care Services shall fund counties with integrated service agencies or countywide systems of care funded under Chapter 982 of the Statutes of 1988, operating at the time of passage of this part. Those programs shall be funded under the provisions paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5700 and shall be subject to all of the requirements and sanctions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 186.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5805.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall require counties to use available state and matching funds for the client target population as defined in Section 5600.3 to develop a comprehensive array of services as defined in Sections 5600.6 and 5600.7.

(b) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 35.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 36 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5805.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall require counties to use funds distributed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5891 for eligible adults and older adults, as defined in Section 5892, to develop a comprehensive array of services, as defined in Sections 5600.6 and 5600.7, and substance use disorder treatment services, as defined in Section
 5891.5.

(b) A county may include services to address first episode psychosis.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 35) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 36.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5806.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall establish service standards that ensure that members of the target population are identified, and services provided to assist them to live independently, work, and reach their potential as productive citizens. The department shall provide annual oversight of grants issued pursuant to this part for compliance with these standards. These standards shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A service planning and delivery process that is target population based and includes the following:

(1) Determination of the numbers of clients to be served and the programs and services that will be provided to meet their needs. The local director of mental health
 shall consult with the sheriff, the police chief, the probation officer, the mental health board, contract agencies, and family, client, ethnic, and citizen constituency groups as determined by the director.

(2) Plans for services, including outreach to families who have an adult child experiencing a serious mental health condition living with them, design of mental health services, coordination and access to medications, psychiatric and psychological services, substance use disorder services, supportive housing or other
 housing assistance, vocational rehabilitation, and veterans’ services. Plans also shall contain evaluation strategies that shall consider cultural, linguistic, gender, age, and special needs of minorities in the target populations. Provision shall be made for a workforce with the cultural background and linguistic skills necessary to remove barriers to mental health services due to limited-English-speaking ability and cultural differences. Recipients of outreach services may include families, the public, primary care physicians, and others who are likely to come into contact with individuals who may be experiencing an untreated severe mental illness who would be likely to become homeless if the illness continued to be untreated for a substantial period of time. Outreach to adults may include adults
 voluntarily or involuntarily hospitalized as a result of a severe mental illness.

(3) Provision for services to meet the needs of target population clients who are physically disabled.

(4) Provision for services to meet the special needs of older adults.

(5) Provision for family support and consultation services, parenting support and consultation services, and peer support or self-help group support, where appropriate for the individual.

(6) Provision for services to be client-directed and that employ psychosocial rehabilitation and recovery principles.

(7) Provision for psychiatric and psychological services that are integrated with other services and for psychiatric and psychological
 collaboration in overall service planning.

(8) Provision for services specifically directed to
 young adults 25 years of age or younger who have a serious mental illness and are homeless or at significant risk of becoming homeless. These provisions may include continuation of services that still would be received through other funds had eligibility not been terminated due to age.

(9) Services reflecting special needs of women from diverse cultural backgrounds, including supportive housing that accepts children, personal services coordinator therapeutic treatment, and substance treatment programs that address gender-specific trauma and abuse in the lives of persons with mental illness, and vocational rehabilitation programs that offer job training programs free of gender bias and sensitive to the needs of women.

(10) Provision for housing for clients
 that is immediate, transitional, permanent, or all of these.

(11) Provision for clients who have been experiencing an untreated severe mental illness for less than one year, and who do not require the full range of services but are at risk of becoming homeless unless a comprehensive individual and family support services plan is implemented. These clients shall be served in a manner that is designed to meet their needs.

(12) Provision for services for veterans.

(b) A client shall have a clearly designated mental health personal services coordinator who may be part of a multidisciplinary treatment team who is
 responsible for providing or
 ensuring needed services. Responsibilities include complete assessment of the client’s needs, development of the client’s personal services plan, linkage with all appropriate community services, monitoring of the quality and followthrough of services, and necessary advocacy to ensure that the client receives those services that are agreed to in the personal services plan. A client shall participate in the development of their personal services plan, and responsible staff shall consult with the designated conservator, if one has been appointed, and, with the consent of the client, consult with the family and other significant persons as appropriate.

(c) The individual personal services plan shall ensure that members of the target population involved in the system of care receive age-appropriate, gender-appropriate, and culturally appropriate services or appropriate services based on any characteristic
 listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, to the extent feasible, that are designed to enable recipients to:

(1) Live in the most independent, least restrictive housing feasible in the local community, and for clients with children, to live in a supportive housing environment that strives for reunification with their children or assists clients in maintaining custody of their children as is appropriate.

(2) Engage in the highest level of work or productive activity appropriate to their abilities and experience.

(3) Create and maintain a support system consisting of friends, family, and participation in community activities.

(4) Access an appropriate level of academic education or vocational training.

(5) Obtain an adequate income.

(6) Self-manage their illness and exert as much control as possible over both the day-to-day and long-term decisions that affect their lives.

(7) Access necessary physical health care and maintain the best possible physical health.

(8) Reduce or eliminate serious antisocial or criminal behavior and thereby reduce or eliminate their contact with the criminal justice system.

(9) Reduce or eliminate the distress caused by the symptoms of mental illness.

(10) Have freedom from dangerous addictive substances.

(d) The individual personal
 services plan shall describe the service array that meets the requirements of subdivision (c) and, to the extent applicable to the individual, the requirements of subdivision (a).

(e) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 37) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 44.5.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 45 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 948.)
-------------------------------------------

5806.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall establish service standards so that adults and older adults in the target population are identified and receive needed and appropriate services from qualified staff in the least restrictive environment to assist them to live independently, work, and thrive in their communities. This section shall not apply to services covered by the Medi-Cal program and services covered by a health care service plan or other insurance coverage. These standards shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) For services funded pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5892, the county may consult with the stakeholders listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5963.03.

(2) (A) Outreach to adults with a serious mental illness or a substance use disorder to provide coordination and access to behavioral health services, medications, housing interventions pursuant to Section 5830, supportive services, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 5887, and veterans’ services.

(B) Service planning shall include evaluation strategies that consider cultural, linguistic, gender, age, and special needs of the target populations.

(C) Provision shall be made for a workforce with the cultural background and linguistic skills necessary to remove barriers to mental health services and substance use disorder treatment services due to limited-English-speaking ability and cultural differences.

(D) Recipients of outreach
 services may include families, the public, primary care physicians, hospitals, including emergency departments, behavioral health urgent care, and others who are likely to come into contact with individuals who may be
 experiencing either an untreated serious mental illness or substance use disorder, or both, who would likely become homeless or incarcerated if the illness continued to be untreated for a substantial period of time.

(E) Outreach to adults may include adults voluntarily or involuntarily hospitalized as a result of a serious mental illness.

(3) Provision for services for populations with identified disparities in behavioral health outcomes.

(4) Provision for full participation of the family in all aspects of assessment, service planning, and treatment, including, but not limited to, family support and consultation services, parenting support and consultation services, and peer support or self-help group support, where appropriate and when supported by the individual.

(5) Treatment for clients who have been
 experiencing an untreated serious mental illness or substance use disorder, or both, for less than one year and who do not require the full range of services but are at risk of becoming homeless or incarcerated unless comprehensive individual and family support services are provided consistent with the planning process specified in subdivision (d). This includes services that are available and designed to meet their needs, including housing for clients that is immediate, transitional, permanent, or all of these services.

(6) (A) Provision for services to be client-directed and to employ psychosocial rehabilitation and recovery principles.

(B) Services may be integrated with other services and may include psychiatric and psychological collaboration in overall service planning.

(7) Provision for services specifically directed to young adults 25 years of age or younger with either a serious mental illness or substance use disorder, or both, who are chronically homeless, experiencing homelessness or are at risk of homelessness, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 5892, or experiencing first episode psychosis. These provisions may include continuation of services that still would be received through other funds had eligibility not been terminated due to age.

(8) Provision for services for frequent users of behavioral health urgent care, crisis stabilization units, and hospitals or emergency room services as the primary resource for mental health and substance use disorder treatment.

(9) Provision for services to meet the special needs of clients who are physically disabled, clients who are
 intellectually or developmentally disabled, veterans, or persons of American Indian or Alaska Native descent.

(10) Provision for services to meet the special needs of women from diverse cultural backgrounds, including supportive housing that accepts children and youth, personal services coordinators, therapeutic treatment, and substance use disorder treatment programs that address gender-specific trauma and abuse in the lives of persons with either a serious mental illness or a substance use disorder, or both, and vocational rehabilitation programs that offer job training programs free of gender bias and sensitive to the needs of women.

(b) Each adult or older adult shall have a clearly designated personal services coordinator, or case manager who may be part of a multidisciplinary treatment team who is responsible for providing case management services. The personal services
 coordinator may be a person or entity formally designated as primarily responsible for coordinating the services accessed by the client. The client shall be provided information on how to contact their designated person or entity.

(c) A personal services coordinator shall perform all of the following:

(1) Conduct a comprehensive assessment and periodic reassessment of a client’s needs. The assessment shall include all of the following:

(A) Taking the client’s history.

(B) Identifying the individual’s needs, including reviewing available records and gathering information from other sources, including behavioral health service providers, medical providers, family members, social workers, and others needed to form a complete assessment.

(C) Assessing the client’s living arrangements, employment status, and training needs.

(2) Plan for services using information collected through the assessment. The planning process shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify the client’s goals and the behavioral health, supportive, medical, educational, social, prevocational, vocational, rehabilitative, housing, or other community services needed to assist the client to reach their goals.

(B) Include active participation of the client and others in the development of the client’s goals.

(C) Identify a course of action to address the client’s needs.

(D) Address the transition of
 care when a client has achieved their goals.

(3) Assist the client in accessing needed behavioral health, supportive, medical, educational, social, prevocational, vocational, rehabilitative, housing, or other community services.

(4) Coordinate the services the county furnishes to the client between settings of care, including appropriate discharge planning for short-term hospital and institutional stays.

(5) Coordinate the services the county furnishes to the client with the services the client receives from managed care organizations, the Medicaid fee-for-service delivery system, other human services agencies, and community and social support providers.

(6) Ensure that, in the course of coordinating care, the client’s privacy is protected in accordance
 with all federal and state privacy laws.

(d) The county shall ensure that each provider furnishing services to clients maintains and shares, as appropriate, client health records in accordance with professional standards.

(e) The service planning process shall ensure that adults and older adults receive age-appropriate, gender-appropriate, and culturally appropriate services, or appropriate services based on a characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, to the extent feasible, that are designed to enable recipients to:

(1) (A) Live in the most independent, least restrictive housing feasible in the local community and for clients with children and youth, to live in a supportive housing environment that strives for reunification with their children and youth or
 assists clients in maintaining custody of their children and youth, as appropriate.

(B) Assist individuals to rejoin or return to a home that had previously been maintained with a family member or in a shared housing environment that is supportive of their recovery and stabilization.

(2) Engage in the highest level of work or productive activity appropriate to their abilities and experience.

(3) Create and maintain a support system consisting of friends, family, and participation in community activities.

(4) Access an appropriate level of academic education or vocational training.

(5) Obtain an adequate income.

(6) Self-manage their illness and exert as much control as possible over both the day-to-day and long-term decisions that affect their lives.

(7) Access necessary physical health care and maintain the best possible physical health.

(8) Reduce or eliminate serious antisocial or criminal behavior and thereby reduce or eliminate their contact with the justice system.

(9) Reduce or eliminate the distress caused by the symptoms of either serious mental illness or substance use disorder, or both.

(10) Utilize trauma-informed approaches to reduce trauma and avoid retraumatization.

(f) (1) (A) The client’s clinical record shall describe the
 service array that meets the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (e) and, to the extent applicable to the individual, the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b).

(B) The State Department of Health Care Services may develop and revise documentation standards for service planning to be consistent with the standards developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 14184.402.

(2) Documentation of the service planning process in the client’s clinical record pursuant to paragraph (1) may fulfill the documentation requirements for both the Medi-Cal program and this section.

(g) For purposes of this section, “behavioral health services” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 5892.

(h) For purposes of this section,
 “substance use disorder” shall have the meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 38) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 45.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5807.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall require counties which receive funding to develop interagency collaboration with shared responsibilities for services under this part and achievement of the client and cost outcome goals and interagency collaboration goals specified.

(b) Collaborative activities shall include:

(1) Identification of those agencies that have a significant joint responsibility for the target population and ensuring
 collaboration on planning for services to that population.

(2) Identification of gaps in services to members of the target population, development of policies to assure service effectiveness and continuity, and setting priorities for interagency services.

(3) Implementation of public and private collaborative programs whenever possible to better serve the target population.

(4) Provision of interagency case management services to coordinate resources to target population members who are using the services of more than one agency.

(5) Coordination with federal agencies responsible for providing veterans’ services, as well as national, state, and local nonprofit organizations that provide veterans’ services, to maximize the integration of services and to
 eliminate duplicative efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 190.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5808.

In order to reduce the state and county cost of a mental health system of care, participating counties shall collect reimbursement for services from clients which shall be the same as patient fees established pursuant to Section 5710, fees paid by private or public third-party payers, federal financial participation for Medicaid or Medicare services or veterans’ services, and other financial sources when available.
